

https://www.newspapers.com/image/392057571
	...Mr. Wilberforce, after several preliminary observations delivered in a tone of voice indistinctly heard in the Gallery, stated that he should not have brought the subject of the West Indian Slaves before the House at the present moment, had he not been impelled by a strong sense of duty, though every day convinced him more and more, that the object which he had in view was necessary for the solid and durable interest of all parties--for the West India Colonie, in the first instance, and aftewards the Empire at large.


	...If he was to discard prudence on this question, he might state circumstances whith respect to Barbadoes, which might explain the ground of the insurrection without recurring to the Registry Bill. There were reasons, why in that island in particular, (he hoped this would not be inserted in the Jamaica newspapers), why the Negroes should be discontented. In that island there was a set of white people inferior to those in other colonies, who were likely to be more cruel and unfeeling toward the Slaves over whom they governed, than the inhabitants of other islands. Barbadoes was an island in which from the extent of the white population, from the large military force, and from the want of mountains and fortresses, an insurrection was not likely to be successful; but notwithstanding all these circumstances there was no place in which the negroes were more likely to renounce all idea of personal safety, and all calculation as to success in the overbearing sense of present suffering and degredation. He had entertained an idea of moving for papers which might illustrate the condition of Slaves in that island, but he had renounced that intention, lest it might have injurious influence on the public mind


https://www.thedailybeast.com/the-original-slave-colony-barbados-and-andrea-stuarts-sugar-in-the-blood
	Given how small the island was, many of the whites who couldn’t establish a large plantation moved on to other British colonies. Many went to places that would become part of the United States. They replicated the Barbadian plantation model, growing mainly rice and tobacco, and had an outsized impact on early America. In colonies like South Carolina, six of the governors were Barbadians between 1670 and 1730. Other Barbadian émigrés, like George Ashby’s Quaker brother, helped settle Pennsylvania. Barbados was so important to the British colonial system that even George Washington, who only left North America once in his life, made that stop on the island, to help his sick brother recover from an illness.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Delphine_LaLaurie


maybe this guy too: https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Crenshaw_House_(Gallatin_County,_Illinois)


------


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Delphine_LaLaurie
	Marie Delphine Macarty or MacCarthy (March 19, 1787 – December 7, 1849), more commonly known as Madame Blanque, until her third marriage and subsequent infamy remodeled her Madame LaLaurie, was a New Orleans Creole socialite and alleged murderer, infamous for torturing and likely murdering her household slaves.

	Born during the Spanish colonial period, Delphine Macarty married three times in Louisiana, having twice been widowed. She maintained her position in New Orleans society until April 10, 1834, when rescuers responded to a fire at her Royal Street mansion and discovered bound slaves in her attic who showed evidence of cruel, violent treatment over a long period. Lalaurie's house was subsequently sacked by an outraged mob of New Orleans citizens. She escaped to France with her family.[3]



LaLaurie was upper class socialite, tortured and probably murdered slaves, were found in room after fire started in in house. Then a crowd came and sacked her house but she escaped.


	...Marie Delphine Macarty was born March 19, 1787, one of five children. Her father was Louis Barthelemy de McCarty, originally Chevalier de MacCarthy) whose father Barthelemy (de) MacCarthy brought the family to New Orleans from Ireland around 1730, during the French colonial period.[4] (The Irish surname MacCarthy was shortened to Macarty or de Macarty.) Her mother was Marie-Jeanne L'Erable, [5] also known as "the widow Le Comte", her marriage to Louis B. Macarty being her second.[4] Both were prominent in the town's white Creole community.[6] Delphine's Uncle, by marriage, Esteban Rodríguez Miró, was Governor of the Spanish American provinces of Louisiana and Florida during 1785–1791, and her cousin, Augustin de Macarty, was Mayor of New Orleans from 1815 to 1820.[7]


LaLaurie's and her family were prominant in New Orlean's white creole community and had extended family in government positions


	...On June 11, 1800, Mlle. Marie Delphine Macarty married Don Ramón de Lopez y Angulo, a Caballero de la Royal de Carlos, a high-ranking Spanish royal officer,[6][8] at the Saint Louis Cathedral in New Orleans.[6] Luisiana, as it was spelled in Spanish, had become a Spanish colony in the 1760s. In 1804, after the American acquisition, Don Ramón had been appointed to the position of consul general for Spain in the Territory of Orleans.[6]

	Also, in 1804, Delphine and Ramón Lopez traveled to Spain.[6] Accounts of the trip vary. Grace King wrote in 1921 that the trip was Lopez's "military punishment" and that Señora Delphine Lopez met the Queen, who was impressed with Mrs. Lopez's beauty.[9] Stanley Arthur's 1936 report differed; he stated that on March 26, 1804, Don Ramón Lopez was recalled to Spain "to take his place at court as befitting his new position," but that Lopez never arrived in Madrid because he died in en route, in Havana.[6]

	During the voyage, Delphine gave birth to a daughter, named Marie-Borja/Borgia Delphine Lopez y Angulo de la Candelaria, nicknamed Borquita.[6][9] Delphine and her daughter returned to New Orleans afterwards.[10]


She married a Spanish royal officer (was Spanish colony for awhile) and went on trip to Spain and maybe met the Queen, but accounts of this trip differ (why?)

her first husband died in 1804 but she had a daughter Borquita

	
	...In June 1808, Delphine married Jean Blanque, a prominent banker, merchant, lawyer, and legislator.[6] At the time of the marriage, Blanque purchased a house at 409 Royal Street in New Orleans for the family, which became known later as the Villa Blanque.[6] Delphine had four more children by Blanque, named Marie Louise Pauline, Louise Marie Laure, Marie Louise Jeanne, and Jeanne Pierre Paulin Blanque.[6] Blanque died in 1816.[11]


then she married a prominant banker, merchant, lawyer, and legislator in 1808. They had four kids and he died in 1816.


	...Delphine married her third husband, physician Leonard Louis Nicolas LaLaurie, who was much younger than she,[12] on June 25, 1825.[11] In 1831, she bought property at 1140 Royal Street,[13] which she managed in her own name with little involvement of her husband,[12] and in 1832 had built a 2-story mansion there,[11] complete with attached slave quarters. She lived there with her third husband and two of her daughters,[12] and maintained a central position in New Orleans society.[3]


then in 1825 she married a physician who was much younger than she. She bought a property on Royal street and built a mansion complete with attached slave quarters. She lived there and maintained a central position in New Orleans society.


	...The LaLauries maintained several black slaves in slave quarters, attached to the Royal Street mansion. Accounts of Delphine LaLaurie's treatment of her slaves between 1831 and 1834 are mixed. Harriet Martineau, writing in 1838 and recounting tales told to her by New Orleans residents during her 1836 visit, claimed LaLaurie's slaves were observed to be "singularly haggard and wretched;" however, in public appearances LaLaurie was seen to be generally polite to black people and solicitous of her slaves' health,[12] and court records of the time showed that LaLaurie manumitted two of her own slaves (Jean Louis in 1819 and Devince in 1832).[14] Nevertheless, Martineau reported that public rumors about LaLaurie's mistreatment of her slaves were sufficiently widespread that a local lawyer was dispatched to Royal Street to remind LaLaurie of the laws relevant to the upkeep of slaves. During this visit, the lawyer found no evidence of wrongdoing or mistreatment of slaves by LaLaurie.[15]


accounts of LaLaurie's treatment of her slaves between 1831 and 1834 are mixed (why?). British sociologist Harriet Martineau visited New Orleans  in 1836 and wrote of what residents told her there. She said LaLaurie's slaves were observed "singularly haggard and wretched", but wikipedia cites someone else saying in public appearances LaLaurie was generally polite to black people and solicitous of her slave's health.

Court records show she manumitted two slaves (why?)

Martineau reported that public rumors about LaLaurie's abuse led to a local lawyer being sent to her house to investigate, but he found no evidence of wrongdoing or mistreatment of slaves by LaLaurie.


why would wikipedia be biased in this paragraph? the "Nevertheless" gives it away, freeing slaves or being nice to them obviously doesn't rule out being a serial killer. Also why cite some sources straight and others as "Martineau reports..."?


what is Martineu's report on LaLaurie case? maybe doing sociology project?


	Martineau also recounted other tales of LaLaurie's cruelty that were current among New Orleans residents in about 1836. She claimed that, subsequent to the visit of the local lawyer, one of LaLaurie's neighbors saw one of the LaLauries' slaves, a twelve-year-old girl named Lia (or Leah), fall to her death from the roof of the Royal Street mansion while trying to avoid punishment from a whip-wielding Delphine LaLaurie. Lia had been brushing Delphine's hair when she hit a snag, causing Delphine to grab a whip and chase her. The body was subsequently buried on the mansion grounds. According to Martineau, this incident led to an investigation of the LaLauries, in which they were found guilty of illegal cruelty and forced to forfeit nine slaves. These nine slaves were then bought back by the LaLauries through the intermediary of one of their relatives, and returned to the Royal Street residences.[16] Similarly, Martineau reported stories that LaLaurie kept her cook chained to the kitchen stove, and beat her daughters when they attempted to feed the slaves.[17]


Martineau recorded that a one of LaLaurie's neighbors saw a 12 year old girl that LaLaurie had enslaved was chased by LaLaurie and fell out of a window. This led to an investigation and LaLaurie was found guilty of illegal cruelty (what were charges?).

She was forced to give up 9 slaves (was this all of them?), but one of her relatives helped bring them back to her Royal Street residence (how did this happen? Were the slaves witnesses to anything? say anything?).

Martineau also reported that LaLaurie kept her cook chained to the stove and beat her daughters when they tried to feed the slaves.  


	On April 10, 1834, a fire broke out in the LaLaurie residence on Royal Street, starting in the kitchen. When the police and fire marshals got there, they found a seventy-year-old woman, the cook, chained to the stove by her ankle. She later confessed to them that she had set the fire as a suicide attempt for fear of her punishment, being taken to the uppermost room, because she said that anyone who was taken there never came back. As reported in the New Orleans Bee of April 11, 1834, bystanders responding to the fire attempted to enter the slave quarters to ensure that everyone had been evacuated. Upon being refused the keys by the LaLauries, the bystanders broke down the doors to the slave quarters and found "seven slaves, more or less horribly mutilated ... suspended by the neck, with their limbs apparently stretched and torn from one extremity to the other", who claimed to have been imprisoned there for some months.[18]


A fire broke out in LaLaurie residence April 10 1834. Responders got there and found 70 year old woman chained to the stove, who said she set the fire as a suicide attempt for fear of punishment, being taken to the uppermost room, because she said anyone who was taken there never came back.

The New Orleans Bee reported that bystanders responding to the fire tried to evacuate the slave quarters, but the LaLauries refused the keys. They broke down the doors and found "seven slaves, more or less horribly mutilated ... suspended by the neck, with their limbs apparently stretched and torn from one extremity to the other". Some were alive and claimed to have been imprisoned for months.


	One of those who entered the premises was Judge Jean-Francois Canonge, who subsequently deposed to having found in the LaLaurie mansion, among others, a "negress ... wearing an iron collar" and "an old negro woman who had received a very deep wound on her head [who was] too weak to be able to walk." Canonge claimed, that when he questioned Madame LaLaurie's husband about the slaves, he was told in an insolent manner that "some people had better stay at home rather than come to others' houses to dictate laws and meddle with other people's business."[19]

	A version of this story circulating in 1836, recounted by Martineau, added that the slaves were emaciated, showed signs of being flayed with a whip, were bound in restrictive postures, and wore spiked iron collars which kept their heads in static positions.[17]


Judge Canonge also entered premises and found a black woman wearing an iron collar and another old woman with a very deep wound on her head who was too weak to walk. He questioned LaLaurie's husbund who told him to stay out of his business.

At this point, why were they even there and saying that to a Judge? And why not arrested by that point?


	When the discovery of the tortured slaves became widely known, a mob of local citizens attacked the LaLaurie residence and "demolished and destroyed everything upon which they could lay their hands".[18] A sheriff and his officers were called upon to disperse the crowd, but by the time the mob left, the Royal Street property had sustained major damage, with "scarcely any thing [remaining] but the walls."[20] The tortured slaves were taken to a local jail, where they were available for public viewing. The New Orleans Bee reported that by April 12 up to 4,000 people had attended to view the tortured slaves "to convince themselves of their sufferings."[20]


when this became widely known, a mob came and attacked the mansion and destroyed everything so that "scarecly anything but the walls" remained. The Sheriff was called but didn't get there in time (why?).

Did this wreck the crime scene enough to have less of a case against LaLaurie? other people?

The tortured slaves were taken to a local jail, and New Orleans Bee reported that by April 12 up to 4,000 people attended to view them "to convince themselves of their sufferings" (why not taken to hospital?) 


	The Pittsfield Sun, citing the New Orleans Advertiser and writing several weeks after the evacuation of LaLaurie's slave quarters, claimed that two of the slaves found in the LaLaurie mansion had died since their rescue, and added, "We understand ... that in digging the yard, bodies have been disinterred, and the condemned well [in the grounds of the mansion] having been uncovered, others, particularly that of a child, were found."[21] These claims were repeated by Martineau in her 1838 book Retrospect of Western Travel, where she placed the number of unearthed bodies at two, including the child.[17]


The Pitssfield sun and Martineau reported bodies were discovered buried in LaLaurie's yard including a kid's body.

Why is paragraph written this way? also says at top LaLaurie an "alleged" murderer (technically true wasn't convicted)


	Delphine LaLaurie's life after the 1834 fire is not well documented. Martineau wrote in 1838, that LaLaurie fled New Orleans during the mob violence that followed the fire, taking a coach to the waterfront and travelling, by schooner, from there to Mobile, Alabama and then on to Paris.[22] Certainly by the time Martineau personally visited the Royal Street mansion in 1836 it was still unoccupied and badly damaged, with "gaping windows and empty walls".[23]


LaLaurie's life "not well documented" after this. Martineau reported that She fled during the mob violence to Alabama and then Paris.

How was she able to escape? Fire on April 10th, that and mob violence reported April 11th. Weird that discovery became "widely known" enough for mob to show up and wreck things before police got there, or police there and didn't arrest her and she fled.

Why not extradite if in Paris?

	
	...The circumstances of her death are also unclear. George Washington Cable recounted in 1888, a then-popular but unsubstantiated story, that LaLaurie had died in France, in a boar-hunting accident.[24] Whatever the truth, in the late 1930s, Eugene Backes, who served as sexton to St. Louis Cemetery #1 until 1924, discovered an old cracked, copper plate in Alley 4 of the cemetery. The inscription on the plate read "Madame LaLaurie, née Marie Delphine Maccarthy, décédée à Paris, le 7 Décembre, 1842, à l'âge de 6--."[25] A rough English translation of the inscription reads this: "Madame LaLaurie, born Marie Delphine Mccarty, died in Paris, December 7, 1842, at the age of 6-- "[26]

	According to the French archives of Paris, however, Marie Delphine Maccarthy died on December 7, 1849, at age of 69.[2]


also conflicted accounts of when and how she died


LaLaurie and her house became part of folklore and there were many stories told about this (kindof like Hellfire clubs?)


------


first news report of it I think:

http://nobee.jefferson.lib.la.us/Vol-009/04_1834/1834_04_0034.pdf


https://web.archive.org/web/20101116011843/http://www.nola.com/lalaurie/archives/fire1.html
	The New Orleans Bee
	April 11, 1834

	The conflagration at the house occupied by the woman Lalaurie in Hospital st. has been the means of discovering one of discovering one of those atrocities the details of which seem to be too incredible for human belief.

	We would shrink from the task of detailing the painful circumstances connected herewith, were it not that a sense of duty and the necessity of exposing and holding to the public indignation such a wretch as the perpetrator, renders it indispensable for us to do so.

	The flames having spread with an alarming rapidity, and the horrible suspicion being entertained among the spectators that some of the inmates of the premises where it originated, where incarcerated therein, the doors were forced open for the purpose of liberating them. Previous however, to taking this liberty, (if liberty it can be called), several gentlemen impelled by their feelings of humanity demanded the keys which were refused them in a gross and insulting manner. Upon entering one of the apartments, the most appalling spectacle met their eyes. Seven slaves more or less horribly mutilated were seen suspended by the neck, with their limbs apparently stretched and torn from one extremity to the other. Language is powerless and inadequate to give a proper conception of the horror which a scene like this must have inspired. We shall not attempt it, but leave it rather to the reader's imagination to picture what it was.

	These slaves were the property of the demon, in the shape of a woman whom we mentioned in the beginning of this article. They had been confined by her for several months in the situation from which they had thus providentially been rescued and had been merely kept in existence to prolong their suffering and to make them taste all that the most refined cruelty could inflict. But why dwell upon such aggravating and painful particulars! We feel confident that the community share with us our indignation, and that vengeance will fall heavily upon the guilty culprit. Without being superstitious, we cannot but regard the manner in which these atrocities have been brought to light as an especial interposition of heaven.

	{Since the above was in type, the populace have repaired to the house of this woman and have demolished and destroyed everything upon which they could lay their hands. At the time of inditing this fury of the mob remained still unabated and threatens the total demolition of the entire edifice.}

	------------

	The 10th of April has been a memorable day in New-Orleans. In addition to the conflagration and the horrifying disclsures consequent therefor, we hae to notice a murder Johnson a deputy...


	------------

	The calendar of crime multiplies upon our hands. We understand that evening before last, a man employed at the rail-road named Rives, killed another at the lake with a knife. The deed, it is alleged, was committed while attempting to keep some sailors from making a noise. With one hand the accused pushed the deceased off, and with the other inflicted the blow. The morals of our people must certainly be getting very bad, when we have to notice the commission of so many acts of depravity in one day.


short article for such a big story 

why does it say house at "Hospital st" when wikipedia article says "Royal st"?

tone of article is off. Other articles are more factual, but this one is almost like feigned indignation.

author sounds incredilous of the details of torture, "seem to be too incredible for human belief," and on discovery "cannot but regard the manner in which tese atrocities have been brought to light as an especial interposition of heaven."

how can it be that "since this was in type" a mob came and destroyed the crime scene? Fire happened the 10th, this was on 11th and I though was first reporting of it. It doesn't make sense that reporters and firemen would be there but not police while a mob came and wrecked everything.

most of anomalies with article could be neatly explained as psycopathic sore loser mocking moral indignation he would see motivation what he sees as plot against his group, doing shit job reporting details on purpose then ending with "by the way the crime scene is being destroyed."

followup next day same paper:

https://web.archive.org/web/20101218031708/http://www.nola.com/lalaurie/archives/fire2.html

http://nobee.jefferson.lib.la.us/Vol-009/04_1834/1834_04_0038.pdf
	 The New Orleans Bee
	April 12, 1834

	The popular fury which we briefly adverted to in our paper of yesterday as consequent upon the discovery of the barbarous and fiendish atrocities committed by the woman Lalaurie upon the persons of her slaves continued unabated the whole of the evening before last and part of yesterday morning.

	It was found necessary for the purpose of restoring order for the sheriff and his officers to repair to the place of riot and to interpose the authority of the state, which we are pleased to notice proved effectual, without the occurrence of any of those acts of violence which are common upon similar occasions.

	We regret, however, to state that previously some indignities had been shown to Judge Caponage who ventured to expostulate with the assailants upon the propriety of ceasing their operations and that during the same, deadly weapons were in the hands of many persons, a resort to which at one time was seriously apprehended. Nothing of the kind happily, however, transpired.

	Nearly the whole of the edifice is demolished, and scarcely any thing remains but the walls, which the popular vengeance have ornamented with various writings expressive of their indignation and the justness of their punishment.

	The loss of property sustained is estimated by some at $40,000, but others think this calculation is exaggerated. It must, however, been very great indeed, as the furniture alone was of the most costly kind, consisting of pianos, armoirs, bufets, &e;, &e;, which were removed to the garret and thrown from thence into the street for the purpose of rendering them of no possible use whatever.

	This is the first act of its kind that our populace have ever engaged in and although the provocation pleads much in favor of the excesses committed, yet we dread the precedent. To say the least of it, it may be excused, but can't be justified. Summary punishments the results of the popular excitement in a government of laws can never admit of justification, let the circumstances be ever so aggravating. 

	------------

	The whole of yesterday and the preceding day, the police jail was crowded by persons pressing forward to witness the unfortunate wretches who had escaped cruelties that would compare with those of a Domitian a Nero or a Caligula. Four thousand persons at least, it is computed have already visited these victims to convince themselves of their sufferings.


"mob" that showed up continued tearing place up evening of 10th and morning of 11th. 

Sheriff and officers arrived I guess arrived morning after fire and demolishing stopped.

Previously, Judge Caponage showed up and asked them to stop and they threatened him with weapons.

New Orleans Bee doesn't offer any more details about torture case but goes on about the destruction of furniture and says that it is excessive.

Reports that the 10th and 11th the police jail was crowded by people to see the people who were tortured (why were they in jail?). Ends that "four thousand persons at least" had visited to "convince themselves of their sufferings."


does author think "probably 4 thousand saw them in jail" enough to justify not reporting details on the torture case?


noteworthy that if "mob" brought in for purpose of destroying crime scene, wouldn't do anything to help LaLaurie at this point. But if anyone else was involved, and evidence in the house pointed to this, that evidence was probably destroyed.


also prints deposition of a Judge:
	
	The following deposition, stating the material facts attendant upon the horrible disclosures at the late conflagration, has been made by Judge Canongo before a magistrate.--Coming from the source it does, it is entitled to full credence. We shall make no comments, but let the document speak for itself.

	...The deponent declares that on Thrusday, 10th inst., a fire took place on the premises of Mde. Lalaurie; that he repaired thither as a citizen for the purpose of affording any assistance within his power; that on arriving there he was apprised of there being in one of the apportments some slaves who were chained and who were, from their situation, exposed to perish in the conflagration. That, at first, he hesitated speaking to Mr. Lalaurie, but addressed some of the friends of the family upon the subject. That being however, all the persons present apparently indifferent to the result he determined upon addressing both Mr. and Madame Lalaurie, who replied to his inquiries of the truth of what has been alleged, that it was a slander. That he thereupon felt constrained to make fresh inquiries into the truth of what he had heard. That mossre Montreuil and Fernandez were near him, and that he desired them both to go into the garret to make the necessary search, observing that he had himself once attempted to do so, but was almost suffocated by the smoke. That these gentlemen came to him some time after and told him that they had made a regular search, but had found nobody. That a gentleman whom he believes to have been Mr. Felix Lefebvre, came to him and said that he had broke the bars of one of the apartments and that he had discovered some slaves, intimating at the same time his willingness to point out the place. That accompanied by several persons whose assistance he desired, he reached the spot pointed out, and that it being deemed advisable that the doors which were locked should be broken open, it was accordingly done. That he entered, accompanied by citizens that were with him, and that two negresses were found incarcerated, whom he liberated from this den, as it were. That several voices were heard declaring that there were other victims in the kitchen; that he repaired thither, but found no one, that one of the negresses had an iron collar, very large and heavy, and was chained with heavy irons by the feet. That she walked with the greatest difficulty; that he had no opportunity of examining the other who was behind. That one individual, whom he believes to have been Mr. Guillotte, said to him that he knew where another slave was confined. That he entered with the gentleman into another apartment, where, upon some ones moving a mosquito bar, an old negress was found who had a deep wound on the head. That she appeared to be quite feeble, too much so to be able to walk; that the deponent desired some of the persons present to have her removed to the mayor's office, where the two first had been removed. That upon his (the deponent) demanding of Mr. Lalaurie if he had any slaved in his garret, he replied in an insulting tone, "that there were persons who would do much better by remaining at home than visiting others to dictate to them laws in the quality of officious friends."

	(Signed) CANONGE.

	Mousre. Goekhatt and Fauche appeared and attested the truth of this deposition.


Judge Canonge showed up to help after the fire and heard from someone there were slaves chained in an apartment to the mansion who would die in the fire. He hesitated to ask Mr. Lalaurie about this and first asked friends of the family, but they seemed indifferent. So he asked Mr. and Mde Lalaurie who denied there were slaves chained up and said it was slander.

After this he "felt constrained to make fresh inquiries into the truth" about the chained up slaves (what does that mean?).

Judge Canonge went to search the garret (a garret is a habitable attic) for people but was suffocated by smoke. He asked Mossre Montreuil and Fernandez to search there instead, and they came back and said they found nobody.

Felix Lefebvre told him he broke the bars of one of the apartments and discovered slaves there. Judge Canonge and some people he asked for help went to the apartment. The doors were locked so they broke them open. He and the citizens entered and found two black women. One of them had a very large and heavy iron collar, was chained with heavy irons on her feet, and walked with great difficulty. He didn't get a chance to examine the other one,. He heard several voices saying there were other victims in the kitchen, but didn't find anyone there. Mr. Guillotte told him he knew where another slave was confined. He followed him into another apartment, where they moved a mosquito net and found an old black women with a deep wound on her head. She was too feeble to walk and Judge Canonge called for some people to have her taken to the mayor's office, where the first two women were taken.

When Judge Canonge asked Mr. Lalaurie if he had any slaves in his garret, he replied in an insulting tone, "that there were persons who would do much better by remaining at home than visiting others to dictate to them laws in the quality of officious friends."


sounds like a lot of people were searching the house for victims while Mr. and Mrs. LaLaurie and their friends were standing outside saying nobody was in there. People they found were chained up, wounded, and could barely walk.

One in a locked room had "very large and heavy" collar, another behind a mosquito net in a different room had a "very deep head wound."


April 11th New Orleans Bee article said 7 people were found mutilated with torn and stretched limbs. Why doesn't this appear in Judge Canonge's testimony?






------


https://www.newspapers.com/image/274376421/?terms=LaLaurie

Baton Rouge Gazette reprint of New Orleans Bee articles April 19 1834 has the two articles but missing last bit about slaves being taken to prison and 4,000 people seeing them.


https://www.newspapers.com/image/225027722/?terms=LaLaurie
	Vicksburg Whig (Vicksburg, Mississippi) 24 Apr 1834

	...New Orleans, April 10.

	A fire broke out this morning in the kitchen of Madame Lalari, corner of Royal and Bayou sts., which was soon wrapt in flames. It was known to some of the neighbors, that the upper part of this building was used as a prison, and that it was then tenanted by several unfortunate slaves loaded with chains. Information of this fact was communicated to Judge Canonge, who instantly waited on Mr. Lalaurie, and asked pormission of that gentlemen, in a polite manner, to have the slaves removed to a place of safety; when the latter, with much rudeness, replied that "there were those who would be better employed if they would attended to their own affairs instead of officiously intermeddling with the concerns of other people." The flames gaining rapidly on the building, orderes were given to break open the doors, which being promptly obeyed, a most appalling sight was presented, in the shape of several wretched negroes emerging from the fire, their bodies covored with scars and loaded with chains! Amongst them was a female slave, upwards of 60 years of age, who could not move. Some young men carried her to the city guard house, where the others, six in number, were also conducted, to be protected from the cruelty of their owner. We saw one of these miserable beings. The sight was so horrible that we could scarce look upon it. The most savage heart could not have witnessed the spectacle unmoved. He had a large hole in his head: his body from head to foot was covered with scars and filled with worms!!! The sight inspired us with so much horror, that even at the moment of writing this article we shudder from its effects. Those who have seen the other represent them to be in a similar condition.

	We forebear a further description of this revolting spectacle as it can hardly be agreeable to the feelings of our readers. We hope the Grand Jury will take cognizance of this unparallelled outrage, and bring the perpetrators of it to the punishment they so richly deserve.--Courier.


sounds sarcastic?

so far multiple reports giving different descriptions of what happened

first New Orleans Bee said 7 found hanging by necks with stretched limbs

then deposition saying found one woman with huge collar and leg irons and another woman with hole in her head

then this saying they found a guy with a large hole in his head, covered head to foot with scars filled with worms

both this and New Orleans Bee article take mocking feigned outrage tone, short, light on details.

This article says Judge Canonge "instantly" asked Mr. Lalaurie about slaves inside house when deposition specifically says he hesistated asking him and asked family friends first. (Maybe Canonge trying to catch them in a lie too? or author suspected as much)

article quotes from deposition, but omits that Lalauries denied there were slaves held prisoner in the burning house

this article also says there were 7 rescued


reprint in 30 May 1834 Weekly Mississippian: https://www.newspapers.com/image/223326673/?terms=LaLaurie


26 April 1834 reprint of New Orleans Bee article in New York Evening Post, pg 2: https://www.newspapers.com/image/38238961/?terms=LaLaurie 

published deposition and other articles 2 days later: https://www.newspapers.com/image/38238976/?terms=LaLaurie

Boston Post summarizes Bee articles in a paragraph-long article 28 April 1834, pg 2: https://www.newspapers.com/image/57573201/?terms=LaLaurie

National Gazette reprint 2nd Bee article April 28 1834, pg 2: https://www.newspapers.com/image/346649720/?terms=LaLaurie


The Tenessean April 29, 1834, pg 3:

https://www.newspapers.com/image/118729379/?terms=LaLaurie
	New Orleans April 11th.
	APPLICATION OF THE LYNCH LAW.

	The atrocious conduct of Madame Lalaurie towards her slaves, which was discovered yesterday by what may be considered the interference of Providence, and her successful escape from the hands of justcie, so exapserated the populace, that they assembled last evening in the vicinity of her dwelling, and about the hour of eight, commenced a regular and fatal attack upon it. In a few minutes, the doors and windows were broken open, when the crowd, composed of persons of all classes and colors, rushed in and the work of destruction commenced. The rooms were well furnished, and the edifice itself was a handsome two story building. in one short hour every article of furniture was thrown into the street and smashed into a thousand pieces: the very pannels and floors were doomed to destruction, nothing, indeed, that they could lay hands on escaped the fury of the people: it was cut and smash, until the interior of the building was stripped of its elegant contents, and completely laid waste. The valuable furniture, jewelry and plate, which had been removed at the time of the fire, were returned to the house in the course of the afternoon, and became a prey to popular vengeance. The mob continued their operations on the roof and walls of the building until a late hour this morning. They were in the act of pulling down the walls, when the sheriff and several citizens interferred and put an end to their work. The house, however, is a complete wreck.

	This is the first instance, in this city, of a resort by the populace to the above summary mode of punishing outrages against public feeling. No doubt it is justifiable in extreme cases; but we feel convinced that had the leaders in the above disturbance reflected for a moment on the character of the materials that enter, to a considerable extent, into the composition of our population, they would not have assisted in establishing a precedent which may be dangerous in consequences, unless our authorities awake from the torpor into which they seem to be thrown.--Courier.


according to this, LaLaurie removed her furniture and valuables from her house but not her slaves. She escaped justice which further angered the populace, and then the mob came and started smashing her furniture.

author I guess is saying "maybe this is justifiable but you're not so great either"


Pitssburgh Gazette reprints a bunch of articles on pg 2 May 2, 1834:

https://www.newspapers.com/image/96011834/?terms=LaLaurie

first reprints Vicksburg Whigh article

then

	The Louisiana Advertiser remarks--We are sorry to be obliged to copy the above article, which may give a coloring to the bad opinion expressed and sought to be disseminated against us in the north. But as proof that our population are not generally composed of such monsters ad Madam Lalaurie, we have, however much we may be opposed to mobs, the pleasure, as citizens of New Orleans, of stating that last night the infuriated populace assaulted, and, in their just indignation, sought the wretch, but not finding her, demolished her dwelling, and destroyed her property.

	But we leave the subject to judicial investigation, assured that Justcie will be done, and the guilty be brought to punishment.


then quotes second Bee article on furniture being destroyed, and followup of citizens seeing tortured people at prison

then reprints Judge Canonge deposition


The Liberator (Boston, Massachusetts) May 3rd 1834, pg 3:

https://www.newspapers.com/image/35043082/?terms=LaLaurie
	Hear ye deaf, and look ye blind, that ye may see.--Isaiah.

	Horrible! The New Orleans papers of the 11th inst. make us acquainted with a scene of cruelty which has few parallels in the annals of guilt. If the wretch who perpetrated the outrage, deserves any thing short of death, there are crimes now punishable with death, which ought to incur a milder penalty.--N. Y. Jour. of Com.

	[From the New-Orleans Mercantile Advertiser.]

	Shocking Barbarity.--Yesterday at about 10 o'clock, the dwelling house of a Mr. Lalaurie, corner of Royal and Hospital streets, was discovered to be on fire, and whilst the engines were occupied in extinguishing it, it was rumored that several slaves were kept chained in some of the apartments. The crowd rushed in to their deliverance, and amongst others, Mr. Canonge, Judge of the criminal court, who demanded of Mr. and Mrs. Lalaurie, where these poor creatures were kept, which they obstinately refused to disclose, when Mr. Canonge with a manly and praiseworthy zeal rushed into the kitchen, which was on fire, followed by two or three young men, and brought forth a negro woman, found there chained. She was covered with bruises and wounds from severe flogging. All the apartments were then forced open. In a room on the ground floor, two more were found chained and in a deplorable condition. Upstairs and in the garret, four more were found chained, some so weak as to be unable to walk, and all covered with wounds ans sores. One, a mulatto boy, declares himself to have been chained for five months, being fed daily with only a handful of meal, and receiving every morning the most cruel treatment.


then reprints first New Orleans Bee article

	...These details of a great crime have caused astonishment and horror, in whatever community they have reached. The most skeptical are staggered; the apologists of slavery look wild and terrified; the sectarian and partizan press has opened to admit these paragraphs; bustling, busy, selfish politicians, office-holders and seekers, dough-faces and white slaves have manifested on this occasion, a sympathy for human wo. And well they may. If they did not, they must be lost past all redemption.

	In a republic, (in the midst of a populous city,) under the vaunted sway of laws,--seven of the *declared* heirs of 'inalienable rights' upon earth, and of glory beyond the grave, have been shut up, starved, fettered, manacled and lacerated for months without any offence proved, and in all human probability without any committed! The awful consummation was providentially prevented! But what heart can conceive the pangs, which those poor slaves must have suffered before their deliverers came? They were chained, and the devouring fire was approaching them with irresistible and rapid progress. Why did they not shriek? Let this question be pondered------. The firemen of New-Orleans were apprized of the appaling fact that seven men were about to perish within arms length, *by rumor* only! Why did not those lost wretches call aloud for help, when the fire first spread? There can be but two answers to this question. They either welcomed death as a friend, though in *this* form, or they were accustomed to know that cries of distress from *a slave* are not wont to bring succor or to attract notice!*

	...*One of the students of Lane Seminary, a gentleman from Alabama, at the late interesting debate, made the following among other statements.

	Speaking of the cruelities practiced upon the slave, he said--'At our house it is so common to hear their screams from a neighboring plantation, that we think nothing of it.'--See Letter of A. Wattles, in the Emancipator, April 22.

	...It is very remarkable that nothing is said about the arrest of the guilty man and woman. Their keys were politely requested of them to open the burning prison house of seven perishing brothers. They consistently maintained the right of slaveholding tyrants, and refused to give up the keys. This is the last, and *all* that w hear of that diabolical couple. Perhaps the notoriety, which this event has acquired, (and for which we suspect that the New-Orleans Editors will be blamed by *slaveholders*,) may cause some show of justice to be enacted. But let it be now noted that the mails which have brought the account of the fire, the rescue, the mob, the demolition of the building remaining after the fire, and the presence, in these scenes, of the chief criminal judge of the city, have not yet brought one word about the arrest, or any attempt or movement, to arrest the great criminals. Who can tell where it would hit, if the chaining, starving, lacerating, and torturing of slaves were to be treated as a punishable offence? *If* there be *many* in this same category, it is altogether probable that Madame Lalaurie will not be molested, but will have *these very slaves restored to her accursed hands.* There is no Law in Lousiana which can prevent this result, if she herself remains at large.

	And why should she not be protected and encouraged? Why should *she* be singled out as an object of public vengeance, when she has done no worse than a thousand others who have incurred thereby neither danger nor disgrace?

	At the stea of our republican government, within the 'ten miles square,' there is a clergyman, who feels as a man and a christian concerning the atrocities of slaveholding. He states that he has lived in the District *twenty years.* During all this time, not a single year has passed without the murder within the District of *one* or *more* slaves. During the whole period there has been but *one* execution in the District, and that was of a colored man for *attempting* a crime against a white woman!!

	A planter in Virginia who was in the habit of over-working his slaves, and treating them in other respects with cruelty, chained many of them every night in a large building, and made them pick cottong until midnight. A driver standing near gave a cut to any one who drowsed. By some means the building took fire at a late hour one night, and all the slaves so chained, were consumed. The alarm of fire brought slaves from the neighboring plantations, but when they learned the horrid tragedy, they formed a ring round the master's buildings, suffered the fire to spread, and kept off all assistance until every thing was destroyed.

	A planter in Georgia, called a humane man and a *gentleman*, accosted a man from the North, and asked him if he would join in a negro hunt. The Northern man expressed some disgust at the proposal. 'I had rather,' said theplanter lifting up a shot pouch from his side, 'I had rather put these into Joe's sides than into the best buck in Georgia.' The party wnet. Joe recieved a charge of buck shot in his side, and was led home at at the tail of a horse. Then he was thrown into a hut, where in two days he died. 'He is the *ninth* that I have shot,' said the master exultingly, to his squeamish guest from Massachusetts!

	Professor Wright states that a planter near Woodville, in Mississippi, has whipped *five* slaves to death within fie years, and shows the mounds of earth, where they are buried by the side of the road.

	According to Stuart, the English traveller in 1832, a North Carolina planter whom he saw, was in the habit of punishing his slaves, by putting them alive into coffins, in which situation a number had died of starvation and terror.

	A nephew of Mr. Jefferson, Lilburn Lewis, as Rankin states, took a young slave, who had run away, ordered a large fire to be buit, laid and bound the boy on a meat form, (in which he compelled the boy's brother to help him,) and then proceeded with a broad axe to *cut him up*, beginning at the heels, lecturing his assembled bondmen at intervals upon the sinfulness of running away from their masters, and then throwing the pieces in the fire! The victim entreated, with loud shrikes, that he would begin at the *other* end! But no; he proceeded deliberately, cutting and lecturing, until he arrived at the trunk, when the wretch expired. This man was put in jail, and a mob of planters and planter's sons, was got up, and let him out.

	At the late deeply interesting and ominous debate at the Lane Seminary, some dreadful testimony was given *by the sons of slaveholders*, fresh from the plantations. They are theological students under Dr. Beecher. Their statements will be found in a subsequent article of this day's paper.

	Our space will not admit of more examples at this time. Who, after reading what we have given, will say that we ought not to be rebuked, reviled, persecuted, mobbed, made a *caput lupinum*, and hunted through the land for calling upon our countrymen, in the name of Jesus, the merciful redeemer of man, that they do *now* repent? Who also will say, in view of these things, that poor Mrs. Lalaurie and her mate, ought not to be protected, yea, comforted?


"Mr. Canonge, Judge of the criminal court, who demanded of Mr. and Mrs. Lalaurie, where these poor creatures were kept, which they obstinately refused to disclose"

Liberator has same problem as many other articles on this, omits (in this case more like buries) in what it prints and reprints that LaLaurie's denied there were people trapped in their house and called it slander. That denial is probably strongest piece of evidence implicating them directly.


"And why should she not be protected and encouraged? Why should *she* be singled out as an object of public vengeance, when she has done no worse than a thousand others who have incurred thereby neither danger nor disgrace?"

article starts off raising question of whether the rescued slaves deserved their punishment and why they didn't scream for help, then spends the rest of the article on question "why should LaLaurie be singled out if others have done worse without punishment?"

goes over:

An Alabama man said it was so common to hear screams from neighboring plantation that they think nothing of it

in Washington D.C. not a single year in 20 years has passed without one or more slaves being murdered

a Virginia planter abused his slaves in chained them up in a building, then one night the building caught fire and they all died. Author says fire alarm brought slaves from neighboring plantations, who learned what happened and formed a ring around his buildings holding off assistance and letting the fire spread.

A planter in Georgia boasted to a Massachusetts man that he hunted black people, went out and killed someone and said that was the ninth so far

A Mississippi planter whipped five slaves to death and graves are visible by the side of the road

A North Carolina planter was said to have a habit of putting his slaves in coffins, where many died of starvation and terror

Thomas Jefferson's nephew tied up a slave in front of others and started cutting him up starting from the heels and throwing the pieces in the fire while lecturing them on the sinfulness of running away. The victim begged him to start at the other end but he kept going until he reached the middle and the victim died. Jefferson's nephew was put in jail but a mob of planters and their sons got up and got him out.

says there are more examples, ends with

"Our space will not admit of more examples at this time. Who, after reading what we have given, will say that we ought not to be rebuked, reviled, persecuted, mobbed, made a *caput lupinum*, and hunted through the land for calling upon our countrymen, in the name of Jesus, the merciful redeemer of man, that they do *now* repent? Who also will say, in view of these things, that poor Mrs. Lalaurie and her mate, ought not to be protected, yea, comforted?"

I think he's trying to say it's the people's fault for ignoring things like this going on for a long time, so you can't really blame Lalaurie.


similar to first New Orleans Bee article, with this printed shortly after: "The morals of our people must certainly be getting very bad, when we have to notice the commission of so many acts of depravity in one day."

or The Tenessean article on breaking LaLaurie's furniture: "No doubt it is justifiable in extreme cases; but we feel convinced that had the leaders in the above disturbance reflected for a moment on the character of the materials that enter, to a considerable extent, into the composition of our population"


think this is a kneejerk reaction typical to psycopaths when exposed, say "well you're not so great either." See bringing one psycopath to justice as an attack on them all, and fault by one among the people as making charges by public against a psycopath invalid.

This is a very important thing for them I think, like Tompkins said of Shaw: "He taught me how to rebel against moral hypocrisy."


easy to compare press coverage of LaLaurie case to that of the Leopold Loeb case, where press went back and forth on various arguments why Leopold and Loeb shouldn't face justice. Similar also in the sense that being communication between psycopaths explains the quircks in their reporting.


other things from this to look at:

overall article is generally bad, would be more effective if it didn't use "oh the humanity!" type language and overuse of italics. The facts make a stronger case themselves without these additions. "Show, don't tell" is a principle I think all writers learn in school.

The tone and writing style is reminiscent of the writings of Lenin and other communists, right down to use of italitcs. Lenin sort-of beats you on the head as if to say "no, *this* is how it is," and this article similar. This article is different in excess of "oh the humanity!"-type language (something Lenin wouldn't use since he believed in "communist ethics.").

Similarity in structure (e.g. ask question, string of facts in succession, conclusion), rhetorical devices, arguments (e.g. "they say nothing on X, so therefore..." shows up a lot in his writing). 


https://www.newspapers.com/image/35043082/?terms=LaLaurie
	It is very remarkable that nothing is said about the arrest of the guilty man and woman. Their keys were politely requested of them to open the burning prison house of seven perishing brothers. They consistently maintained the right of slaveholding tyrants, and refused to give up the keys. This is the last, and *all* that w hear of that diabolical couple. Perhaps the notoriety, which this event has acquired, (and for which we suspect that the New-Orleans Editors will be blamed by *slaveholders*,) may cause some show of justice to be enacted. But let it be now noted that the mails which have brought the account of the fire, the rescue, the mob, the demolition of the building remaining after the fire, and the presence, in these scenes, of the chief criminal judge of the city, have not yet brought one word about the arrest, or any attempt or movement, to arrest the great criminals. Who can tell where it would hit, if the chaining, starving, lacerating, and torturing of slaves were to be treated as a punishable offence? *If* there be *many* in this same category, it is altogether probable that Madame Lalaurie will not be molested, but will have *these very slaves restored to her accursed hands.* There is no Law in Lousiana which can prevent this result, if she herself remains at large.

	And why should she not be protected and encouraged? Why should *she* be singled out as an object of public vengeance, when she has done no worse than a thousand others who have incurred thereby neither danger nor disgrace?


https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1914/may/28.htm
	As is known, the praises of the new agrarian policy, which is represented as an instrument of “emancipation”, have been sung in a thousand different keys in the governmental, Right, and Octobrist press.

	It is from this standpoint that I wish, in my speech, to deal with the *principles* underlying the government’s policy on the agrarian question. We are told on every hand that the number of land plots “registered” as private property and the number of *otrubs* are increasing. But nothing is said about the extent to which bondage and feudal relations still exist in our rural districts. Yet that is the crux of the matter. We are promised a “European” reform of our backward agriculture, with the class of the feudalist Purishkeviches   retaining full economic and political power. The promises remain promises, but what is the state of affairs in the countryside *today*, *after* all the progress the government boasts of? To what extent are the peasant masses *still* borne down by bondage and feudalist oppression? 


https://www.google.com/search?&q=site%3Ahttps%3A%2F%2Fwww.marxists.org%2Farchive%2Flenin%2Fworks%2F


Could replace "slaveholders" with "capitalists" and a few other words and get close to same essay for some of these (noteworthy that Lenin and the communists helped the "capitalists")


"The Liberator" laments that the public has long ignored these atrocities and therefore you can't blame LaLaurie, but maybe part of the problem is they reported this story like a tabloid and put it on page 3.

More on "The Liberator:"

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/The_Liberator_(newspaper)
	The Liberator (1831–1865) was an American abolitionist newspaper founded by William Lloyd Garrison and Isaac Knapp in 1831.[1]



seems to get that reporting stories like this helps unite people that slavery is bad:


https://www.newspapers.com/image/96011834/?terms=LaLaurie
	...These details of a great crime have caused astonishment and horror, in whatever community they have reached. The most skeptical are staggered; the apologists of slavery look wild and terrified; the sectarian and partizan press has opened to admit these paragraphs; bustling, busy, selfish politicians, office-holders and seekers, dough-faces and white slaves have manifested on this occasion, a sympathy for human wo.


so why do this?

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/The_Liberator_(newspaper)
	Rather than looking to politics to create change, Garrison utilized nonviolent means, such as moral suasion as his message throughout the newspaper.[3][4] Garrison felt that slavery was a moral issue and used his way of writing to appeal to the morality of his readers as an attempt to influence them into changing their morally questionable ways.[5] The Liberator took the stance of William Lloyd Garrison. For example, "No Union with Slave-Holders" was a slogan utilized for weeks at a time throughout the newspaper's publication, advocating that the North should leave the Union.[4]


if just told the facts straight without "Horror on horror accumulate!" headlines, telling people how to feel, invoking north vs. south, interspersing attacks, would get people united on issue of slavery.

I think he knew that... 


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/William_Lloyd_Garrison
	Garrison was born on December 10, 1805, in Newburyport, Massachusetts,[1] the son of immigrants from the British colony of New Brunswick, in present-day Canada. Under An Act for the relief of sick and disabled seamen, Abijah Garrison, a merchant sailing pilot and master, had obtained American papers and moved his family to Newburyport in 1806. The U.S. Embargo Act of 1807, intended to injure Great Britain, caused a decline in American commercial shipping. The elder Garrison became unemployed and deserted the family in 1808. Garrison's mother was Frances Maria Lloyd, reported to have been tall, charming, and of a strong religious character. She started referring to their son William as Lloyd, his middle name, to preserve her family name. She died in 1823, in the city of Baltimore, Maryland.[2]

	...The Liberator

	In 1831, Garrison returned to New England, where he co-founded a weekly anti-slavery newspaper, The Liberator, with his friend Isaac Knapp.[7] In the first issue, Garrison stated:

	    I am aware that many object to the severity of my language; but is there not cause for severity? I will be as harsh as truth, and as uncompromising as justice. On this subject, I do not wish to think, or speak, or write, with moderation. No! No! Tell a man whose house is on fire to give a moderate alarm; tell him to moderately rescue his wife from the hands of the ravisher; tell the mother to gradually extricate her babe from the fire into which it has fallen;—but urge me not to use moderation in a cause like the present. I am in earnest—I will not equivocate—I will not excuse—I will not retreat a single inch—and I will be heard. The apathy of the people is enough to make every statue leap from its pedestal, and to hasten the resurrection of the dead.[8]

	Paid subscription to The Liberator was always smaller than its circulation. In 1834 it had two thousand subscribers, three-fourths of whom were blacks. Benefactors paid to have the newspaper distributed to influential statesmen and public officials. Although Garrison rejected physical force as a means for ending slavery, his critics took his demand for immediate emancipation literally. Some believed he advocated the sudden and total freeing of all slaves, and considered him a dangerous fanatic. Nat Turner's slave rebellion in Virginia just seven months after The Liberator started publication fueled the outcry against Garrison in the South. A North Carolina grand jury indicted him for distributing incendiary material, and the Georgia Legislature offered a $5,000 reward for his capture and conveyance to the state for trial.


"The Liberator" schtick is to report the truth in the style that tends to make people to tune it out, be skeptical, or be incredulous, kindof like Fermi's minority report vs. Oppenheimer's majority report on H-Bomb presented to Eisenhower. So could have been damaging in similar way when it was printed and sent to influential officials.

Being controversial and getting blamed for rebellions also a bad sign--that was reason the Barbados and Jamaica farmers got excuse to ignore plight of slaves and say "it was the abolitionists" fault for instigating insurrection. Boer also had idea that "British made black people police against us", and similar idea was in war of 1812 with some Americans blaming British for getting together American blacks against whites.

	
	...Although Henry Stanton had cooperated in the Tappans' failed attempt to wrest leadership of the AAS from Garrison, he was part of another group of abolitionists unhappy with Garrison's influence—those who disagreed with Garrison's insistence that because the U.S. Constitution was a pro-slavery document, abolitionists should not participate in politics and government.


why not just go back to England?


	...Garrison became famous as one of the most articulate, as well as most radical, opponents of slavery. His approach to emancipation stressed "moral suasion," non-violence, and passive resistance. While some other abolitionists of the time favored gradual emancipation, Garrison argued for "immediate and complete emancipation of all slaves." On July 4, 1854, he publicly burned a copy of the Constitution, condemning it as "a Covenant with Death, an Agreement with Hell," referring to the compromise that had written slavery into the Constitution.[18] In 1855, his eight-year alliance with Frederick Douglass disintegrated when Douglass converted to political abolitionists' view that the document could be interpreted as being anti-slavery.


dude wasn't even trying

compare to:

https://www.usconstitution.net/dream.html
	Martin Luther King

	...In a sense we have come to our nation's capital to cash a check. When the architects of our republic wrote the magnificent words of the Constitution and the Declaration of Independence, they were signing a promissory note to which every American was to fall heir. This note was a promise that all men, yes, black men as well as white men, would be guaranteed the unalienable rights of life, liberty, and the pursuit of happiness.



http://spartacus-educational.com/USASgarrison.htm
	Garrison's views were particularly unpopular in the South and the state of Georgia offered $5,000 for his arrest and conviction. Garrison was highly critical of the Church for its refusal to condemn slavery. Some anti-slavery campaigners began arguing that Garrison's bitter attacks on the clergy was frightening off potential supporters.


------


some Garrison coworkers continuing theme of doing bad job opposing tyranny:

https://books.google.com/books?id=oCqDDAAAQBAJ&pg=PA133&lpg=PA133
	The bombings on the British mainland prompted the Atlantic Anglo-Saxon community to essentially equate Fenianism with terrorism.

	One of the leading advocates and practitioners of the bombing campaign was Jeremiah O'Donovan Rossa. ...Rossa, along with John Devoy and three others known collective as the Cuba Five, reolcated to New York City in 1871, becoming a momentary sensation. Indicitave of the social prominance given to Irish nationalists, the Cuba Five were ceremoniously received by prominent political social leaders and even had an audience with President Ulysses S. Grant at the Executive Mansion. ...Rossa, after a fruitless effort to reuinite Irish-American nationalists under a new organization, launched an unconventional bombing offensive against the British Empire.

	...Once in New York City, O'Donovan rossa openly advertised for contributions for his new offensive against the British and with the assistance of Patrick Ford, and Irish immigrant who had begun his journalism career with William Lloyd Garrison's abolitionist journal The Liberator and later became editor-publisher of the popular nationalist weekly the Irish World and American Industrial Liberator, created the Skirmishing Fund to finance a terrorist bombing campaign.


https://books.google.com/books/about/Ireland_and_the_Americas.html?id=agfvVQnBu9MC
	Born in Galway on April 12, 1837, Patrick Ford immigrated with his parents to Boston in 1845. At the age of 15, Ford became a printer’s devil at the abolitionist William Lloyd Garrison’s newspaper The Liberator and remained there until he was 24. His experiences with Garrison had a lasting effect on his belief and advocacy for social reform.


https://www.tandfonline.com/doi/pdf/10.1080/09546553.2015.1112277
	Terrorism and Political Violence

	The Four Horsemen of Terrorism

	...In the end, Italy’s path to unification would be driven in large part by the actions of regular and irregular forces, rather than clandestine groups, and the torch of Nationalist terrorism would be taken up by Irish Nationalists based in the United States who launched a violent assault on the major cities of the British mainland in the 1880s. The campaign was eight years in the making. In the autumn of 1875 Patrick Ford, the editor of the Brooklyn-based newspaper Irish World , and his brother Augustine, both passionate supporters of Irish independence, had first developed the idea of dispatching what they termed ‘‘skirmishers’’ from the United States to undermine British rule in Ireland. 53 Patrick explained his plan in the pages of Irish World : ‘‘The Irish cause requires skirmishers. It requires a little band of heroes who will initiate and keep up without intermission a guerilla warfare—men who will fly over the land and sea like invisible beings—now striking the enemy in Ireland, now in India, now in England itself, as occasion may present.’’ 54 The use of skirmishers had attracted significant attention during the American Civil War as a result of a ser- ies of influential articles written by General John Watts de Peyster under the title ‘‘New American Tactics.’’ Using their newspaper as a platform, the Fords joined with the Irish Nationalist leader Jeremiah O’Donovan Rossa to establish a ‘‘Skirmishing Fund’’ to raise money for their plan, and it was the revenue from this fund (re-named the National Fund in 1878) that would be used to fund operations of the Irish secret society Clan Na Gael (Family of Gaels) operations, as well as additional attacks by ‘‘skirmishers’’ working directly for Rossa.


http://www.theirishstory.com/2012/02/13/one-skilled-scientist-is-worth-an-army-the-fenian-dynamite-campaign-1881-85/
	The phenomenon of modern terrorism originated in the nineteenth century. In this narrative attention has been particularly given to Russian revolutionaries and their desire to secure political change through violence, directed against political elites rather than the public. Within studies of terrorism fleeting attention is paid to Fenian terrorism, and where it is, it is often deprecating and inequitable.[5]

	In fact, Fenian bombers revolutionised the concept of terrorism in the nineteenth century. Terrorism in an Irish context was pioneered in the Fenian dynamite campaign between 1881-85, when Irish-American Fenianism undertook a sustained terrorist campaign incorporating a series of explosions in British urban centres. For the first time in British history, through an integrated use of explosives and timers, utilising modern technology, the Irish question was not confined to Ireland but now affected daily life in British cities through the unprecedented experience of political violence.

	This dynamite campaign was planned, organised and funded by Irish-Americans, taking advantage of advances in modern science and technology, together with the increasing globalisation of Victorian society.

	For the first time in history, Fenian bombers had the real ability to transcend national boundaries and, using innovative techniques such as employing explosive timers and detonators – they revolutionised the concept of terrorism, changing it from one of irregular attacks against political elites to a sustained campaign designed to establish public terror in order to coerce policy makers.


https://www.tandfonline.com/doi/pdf/10.1080/09546553.2015.1112277
	Between 1881 and 1887 the so-called ‘‘Dynamite Campaign’’ saw high-profile targets in London like Tower Bridge, Scotland Yard, the Palace of Westminster, and the new Underground rail system come under attack—one bomb that detonated on the Metropolitan line injured seventy-two people, mostly third class passengers. 55 There were further bombings in Manchester, Liverpool, and Glasgow.


https://books.google.com/books/about/Ireland_and_the_Americas.html?id=agfvVQnBu9MC
	...In the pages of the Irish World, Ford championed the need for radical social change. An advocate for various reform issues, Ford was a strong supporter of temperance, was against imperialism (both American and British), and argued for women’s and African-American rights. After the outbreak of economic depression in America in 1873, he became a staunch defender of the rights of labor and indus- trial agitation. He backed labor union orga- nization, the eight-hour work day, and the income tax, and he supported Greenback- Labor candidates and land nationalization. Ford argued that the root cause of the ex - ploita tion of the laboring poor was the mono polization of land and wealth by the privileged and nonproducing class of speculators and cartels. His adding the words and American Industrial Liberator to the title of the Irish World in 1878 is evidence of this new emphasis.


https://www.marxists.org/archive/davitt/1890/03/parnellcomm.html



Patrick Ford worked for The Liberator from teen to early adult years and Garrison mentored him there

Ford left and started Irish World and American Indulstrial Liberator, got a lot of funding for Irish nationalist terrorism

went on to be part of new wave of terrorist movement shifting focus from attacking elites to public, also did some marxist kindof stuff


...


Garrison family in past was more direct:

http://www.larouchepub.com/eiw/public/2008/eirv35n07-20080215/eirv35n07-20080215_042-lincolns_american_system_vs_brit.pdf
	His English grandfather, Joseph Garrison, had gone some-time before 1764 to live in New Brunswick, Canada, among settlers who had moved north from the Massachusetts colony. On May 20, 1776, when the people in his village issued a dec-laration siding with the “united provinces” in revolt against British “tyranny,” Joseph Garrison, being English and op-posed to the American cause, was one of a small handful in his village to come outagainst the declaration.

	Joseph’s son, Abijah, left Canada in April 1805, emigrat-ing to Newburyport, Essex County, Mass. Abijah assured his parents that though he was moving to the breakaway U.S.A., he was not “disaffected towards Government.”


some of his friends and proteges also helping screw over America and keeping English Empire going:

https://www.encyclopedia.com/history/united-states-and-canada/us-history/essex-junto
	ESSEX JUNTO is a term coined by President John Adams in the late eighteenth century for a group of Federalists he deemed his adversaries. Jeffersonians then used the term to refer to Federalist opponents they believed to be advocating secession for New England during the War of 1812. Essex Junto has become a term synonymous with secession and treason.

	A number of men, natives of Essex County, Massachusetts, have been named members of this group: Fisher Ames, George Cabot, Francis Dana, Nathan Dane, Benjamin Goodhue, Stephen Higginson, Jonathan Jackson, John Lowell, Theophilus Parsons, Timothy Pickering, Israel Thorndike, and Nathaniel Tracy. Most of the men were well educated and wealthy. They had common social and economic interests and some were related by marriage. They dominated politics in their home county during the 1770s, but in the period between the American Revolution and the early nineteenth century most relocated to Boston.

	...They were adversaries to John Hancock during the revolutionary period, and had opposed the Massachusetts Constitution, proposed in 1778, but from 1779 to 1780, they helped draft a new document. The members of the Essex Junto were not satisfied with the restrictions of the power of the people and did not really care for a system of checks and balances, but nonetheless they supported the Federal Constitution. They supported Alexander Hamilton and his financial program and sharply opposed Thomas Jefferson and his ideas. They were advocates of American independence, but believed in the inherent inequality of men. Disturbed by the social changes the Revolution had brought, they favored a patriarchal society and a nation ruled by an elected aristocracy of elites. 


https://archive.org/stream/liberatorwilliam017641mbp/liberatorwilliam017641mbp_djvu.txt
	Now an enterprising young man stepping into the political scene in 1826 might have ensured his own future and that of his newspaper in one of two ways. He could offer his services to the followers of John Quincy Adams or he could join the liberal insurgents in the administration party who were chafing under the leadership of Boston "nabobs'' and contemplating a new political party. In all the confusion of shifting party alignments one fact was clear the old Federalist Party was dead. To ignore its demise was to indulge in fantasies; to attempt to perpetuate the ideals and aspirations of the Essex Junto was to court political suicide. Yet Lloyd Garrison, neglecting the example of wiser men, determined to hold fast to the spirit of Fisher Ames, lie would rake the ashes of sectionalism until, phoenix-like, the Party of the Wise and the Good rose again in all its pristine glory. 


https://www.encyclopedia.com/people/history/us-history-biographies/fisher-ames 
	An advocate of elitist government, he predicted calamity if French Revolutionary ideas spread in America. His opposition both to Madison's resolutions for anti-British commercial policies in 1794 and to the spreading pro-French Democratic societies was a New Englander's response to deteriorating relations with Great Britain. He sought to arouse Federalists against the "French mania," convinced that unless the "Jacobinism" of the Jeffersonian Republicans was uprooted the nation's liberty would be lost.

	Ames's greatest political triumph was his memorable speech on April 28, 1796, in defense of Jay's Treaty with Great Britain. Though weakened by a recent illness, he dramatically persuaded the House to join the Senate in support of the treaty. 


https://www.historyextra.com/period/georgian/7-things-you-probably-didnt-know-about-the-napoleonic-wars/
	7 things you (probably) didn’t know about the Napoleonic Wars

	...France was courting Denmark and Norway in 1801, and, if they could be persuaded to join the fight, it looked like Russia might also join them. The possibility that Denmark might attack the British mainland could not be contemplated – something had to be done.

	Step forward Admiral Parker, who was sent to carry out some very British gunboat diplomacy


https://www.nps.gov/articles/jay-s-treaty.htm
	Autumn 1794: George Washington supports the Jay Treaty, forestalling war with Britain

	Though over ten years had passed since the end of the American Revolution, the United States and Great Britain continued to quarrel. Some of the major issues were British retention of military posts in northwestern U.S. territory and her interference with American trade and shipping.

	...President George Washington had much on his mind in 1794. War raged on the European continent, and despite issuing an official proclamation of neutrality, Washington nevertheless realized his country could not ignore completely the tumult in Europe between France and Great Britain. And though America had been independent for over a decade, relations with the former mother country remained tense. Britain refused to withdraw its troops from America’s western forts, denied American ships access to ports, and continuously interfered with what Americans regarded as their neutral shipping rights. Many regarded Britain’s provocative behavior as a stinging reminder that the English regarded the American Revolution as far from settled. But what options did the young United States and its first President have?

	Taking up arms could prove foolhardy, since neither the American Army nor its Navy was a match for the battle-tested British military. And war with Britain could prove economically disastrous, dooming the still-vulnerable nation in its infancy. 


https://www.history.com/this-day-in-history/george-washington-signs-jay-treaty-with-britain
	Jefferson, Madison and other opponents feared the treaty gave too many concessions to the British. They argued that Jay’s negotiations actually weakened American trade rights and complained that it committed the U.S. to paying pre-revolutionary debts to English merchants. Washington himself was not completely satisfied with the treaty, but considered preventing another war with America’s former colonial master a priority.


https://www.nps.gov/articles/jay-s-treaty.htm
	...Ultimately, Washington chose the path of negotiation.  Convinced that America would not be ready to confront Britain militarily for at least “twenty years,” Washington believed the wisest path was to buy time through peaceful mediation. Signed in 1794, Jay’s Treaty took its name from America’s chief negotiator in London, John Jay.  


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Jay_Treaty
	...Jay's Treaty, was a 1795 treaty between the United States and Great Britain that averted war, resolved issues remaining since the Treaty of Paris of 1783 (which ended the American Revolutionary War),[1] and facilitated ten years of peaceful trade between the United States and Britain in the midst of the French Revolutionary Wars, which began in 1792.[2] The Treaty was designed by Alexander Hamilton and supported by President George Washington. It angered France and bitterly divided Americans.

	The outbreak of war between France and Great Britain (and other countries) in 1793 ended the long peace that had enabled the new nation to flourish in terms of trade and finance. The United States now emerged as an important neutral country with a large shipping trade.[5] From the British perspective, improving relations with the United States was a high priority lest it move into the French orbit.

	...Without warning American officials, the British government used the Royal Navy to capture nearly 250 neutral American merchant ships carrying goods from French colonies in the West Indies. Americans were outraged and Republicans in Jefferson's coalition demanded a declaration of war, but Madison instead called for an embargo on trade with Britain.[8] British officials told First Nations near the Canada–U.S. border that the border no longer existed and sold weapons to them. Congress voted for a trade embargo against Britain in March 1794.[9]

	...At the national level American politics was divided between the factions of Jefferson and Madison, which favored the French, and the Federalists led by Hamilton, who saw Britain as a natural ally and thus sought to normalize relations with Britain, especially in the area of trade. Washington sided with Hamilton. Hamilton devised a framework for negotiations, and President George Washington sent Chief Justice of the Supreme Court John Jay to London to negotiate a comprehensive treaty.

	The American government had several outstanding issues:[10]

	    The British were occupying forts on U.S. territory in the Great Lakes region, at Detroit and Mackinac in modern-day Michigan, Niagara and Oswego in New York, and Maumee (also Miamis) in modern-day Ohio. Britain said it was in response to American refusals to pay debts that had been agreed upon.[11][self-published source]
	    The British were continuing to impress American sailors into the Royal Navy to fight against France.[12]
	    American merchants wanted compensation for 250 merchant ships which the British had confiscated in 1793 and 1794.
	    Southern interests wanted monetary compensation for slaves owned by Loyalists who were taken away to the West Indies along with their masters in 1781–83.[13]
	    American merchants wanted the British West Indies to be reopened to American trade.[14]
	    The boundary with Canada was vague in many places, and needed to be more sharply delineated.[15]
	    The British were providing munitions to First Nations peoples in armed conflict with settlers in the Northwest (Ohio and Michigan).[16]

	...The treaty was "surprisingly generous" in allowing Americans to trade with Great Britain on a most-favored-nation basis.[18] In return, the United States gave most favored nation trading status to Britain, and acquiesced in British anti-French maritime policies. 

	...Jay, a strong opponent of slavery, dropped the issue of compensation for slaves, which angered Southern slaveholders and was used as a target for attacks by Jeffersonians.[21] Jay was unsuccessful in negotiating an end to the impressment of American sailors into the Royal Navy, which later became a key issue leading to the War of 1812.

	...Evaluations

	Historians Stanley Elkins and Eric McKitrick note that, in conventional diplomatic terms and as a "piece of adversary bargaining", Jay "got much the worst of the 'bargain'. Such a view has to a great degree persisted ever since."[35] They conclude that Jay did not succeed in asserting neutral rights, but he did obtain "his other sine qua nons"; he got none of things that were "desirable, but not indispensable."[36] They add that Jay's record on the symbolic side was open to many objections. However, on the "hard" (or realistic) side, "it was a substantial success, which included the prevention of war with Great Britain."[37]

	Historian Marshall Smelser argues that the treaty effectively postponed war with Britain, or at least postponed it until the United States was strong enough to handle it.[38]


https://historianerdicus.wordpress.com/2013/02/01/britain-in-the-wars-with-france-1793-1815/
	After the outbreak of the French Revolution in 1789, Britain had remained neutral, watching from the side-lines, but in 1793, when French troops occupied Belgian lands, threatening the Dutch as well as British overland trade via the River Scheldt, war was instigated.  British troops were sent onto continental Europe, but were defeated at the battle of Hondschoote in the September of 1793. 

	Britain at this time was allied to the major powers of Europe; the Netherlands, Spain, Austria Prussia and Piedmont-Sardinia.  Had they combined and struck at France it is more than probable that the French Revolution would have been put down and the French Bourbon Monarchy restored.  However, the allies failed to decide upon an organised strategy; The British concentrated their forces in overseas possessions, whilst squandering money to help finance her allies, who used the money for differing aims.  By 1796, only Austria and Britain remained united against France, with Austria receiving so much British financial support that the British economy began to strain.  A punitive French expedition in 1796 failed, and William Pitt the younger sued for peace with France. 

	1797 saw the Bank of England suspend gold payments, Austria make peace with France, and the Netherlands and Spain join the French cause.  Luckily, a naval battle was fought against the Spanish fleet at Cape St. Vincent, helping to maintain British naval hegemony.  As Pitt again attempted peace negotiations, ultimately failing, this left Britain to fight France alone. 


https://www.quora.com/Why-Napoleon-didnt-invade-Britain-and-invaded-Russia-instead
	Why Napoleon didn't invade Britain and invaded Russia instead?

	In addition, Napoleon invaded Russia because it had exited the Continental System and restarted trade with Britain, thus funding the key anti-French power. 


https://www.britannica.com/event/Jay-Treaty
	By February 1796 the treaty, with the exception of an article dealing with West Indian trade, had been ratified by the U.S. and Great Britain. France, then at war with England, interpreted the treaty as a violation of its own commercial treaty of 1778 with the U.S. This resentment led to French maritime attacks on the U.S. and between 1798 and 1800 to an undeclared naval war.


https://www.nps.gov/articles/jay-s-treaty.htm
	...By buying time through negotiated settlement, the President avoided the immediate danger of a costly and potentially disastrous war with Britain—though America’s diplomatic actions did help provoke Britain’s European rival France.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Quasi-War
	The Quasi-War (French: Quasi-guerre) was an undeclared war fought almost entirely at sea between the United States of America and the French Republic from 1798 to 1800. After the toppling of the French crown during the French Revolutionary Wars, the United States refused to continue repaying its debt to France on the grounds that it had been owed to a previous regime. French outrage led to a series of attacks on American shipping, ultimately leading to retaliation from the U.S. The war was called "quasi" because it was undeclared. It involved two years of hostilities at sea, in which both navies attacked the other's shipping in the West Indies. The unexpected fighting ability of the U.S. Navy, which destroyed the French West Indian trade, together with the growing weaknesses and final overthrow of the ruling Directory in France, led Talleyrand to reopen negotiations. At the same time, President Adams feuded with Hamilton over control of the Adams administration. Adams took sudden and unexpected action, rejecting the anti-French hawks in his own party and offering peace to France. In 1800 he sent William Vans Murray to France to negotiate peace; Federalists cried betrayal. Hostilities ended with the signing of the Convention of 1800.[4]


https://www.nps.gov/articles/jay-s-treaty.htm
	...“Twenty years peace [will enable us] to bid defiance to any power on earth. Why then should we prematurely embarrass [ourselves?].”
	--President George Washington


https://www.history.com/this-day-in-history/british-troops-set-fire-to-the-white-house
	This Day in History

	1814
	British troops set fire to the White House



and also break up U.S.:


https://books.google.com/books?id=LBxa-zgLBsQC&pg=PA23&lpg=PA23
	The Letters of William Lloyd Garrison: I will be heard, 1822-1835

	...The truth is, Mr. Walsh's love for the Adams family falls little short of devotion; ...He sees nothing to condemn in the conduct of the man whose whole life has been marked with weakness and instability; who was the main cause of the downfall of Federal Republicanism, of those political principles which Washington and Hamilton promulgated and adopted. He cannot find cause to censure Mr. A. for his disgraceful, unhallowed efforts to anihilate and blast the spotless fame of Timothy Pickering. ...the man that ineffectually strove the sully the memory and writings of Fisher Ames...


https://www.encyclopedia.com/history/united-states-and-canada/us-history/essex-junto
	...President Jefferson, in a letter to John Melish on 13 January 1813, used the label Essex Junto when he accused a group of younger Federalists of advocating anglomany, monarchy, and separation; Federalists had vented their anger with the dire effects the Embargo Act, the Non-intercourse Act, and the War of 1812 had on New England. Early in the war, Pickering and John Lowell Jr. (son of the above mentioned John Lowell) tried to crystallize the secessionist sentiment in New England, but other members of the Junto helped to curb their plans. During the War of 1812, New England dissatisfaction was vocalized in the Hartford Convention (15 December 1814–5 January 1815) in which only two moderate members of the original Essex Junto, Dane and Cabot (the latter was chosen president of the convention) participated. Pickering opposed the convention because he did not believe it would really advocate the dissolution of the Union, as he desired.


and did some of that himself:

https://www.bostonglobe.com/ideas/2016/10/28/when-north-almost-seceded/GlhxrYBNijl830cWtViVtK/story.html
	His fervent abolitionism finally led Higginson to the notion, first propagated by William Lloyd Garrison, that the Constitution was a pact with the devil and the Union a compromise with sin. In the weeks after the 1856 presidential election, when the Democratic candidate, James Buchanan of Pennsylvania, defeated John C. Fremont, the first Republican Party presidential nominee (and an energetic opponent of the expansion of slavery in the West), Higginson and many of his fellow abolitionists decided the moment had arrived to launch a full-on campaign to break up the Union.

	A call for the meeting appeared in Garrison’s newspaper, The Liberator, the day after Christmas. “The result of the recent Presidential election” would necessarily “involve four years more of pro-slavery government, and a rapid increase in the hostility between the two sections of the Union,” the paper observed. “This hostility” was the result of “a fundamental difference in education, habits, and laws.” The Union, then, was “a hopeless attempt to unite under one government two antagonistic systems of society, which diverge more widely with every year.” It was “the duty of intelligent and conscientious men to meet these facts with wisdom and firmness,” the call continued, and that meant assembling “to consider the practicability, probability, and expediency, of a Separation between the Free and Slave States.”

	Presided over by Francis Bird, a wealthy paper manufacturer from Walpole, the convention was a bold and spirited gathering, a meeting of the minds between Garrisonian abolitionists fully prepared to jettison the Union and radical Republicans who still hoped emancipation might be achieved through the political process. Letters were read from activists and politicians on both sides of the question, and between speeches the Hutchinson Family Singers sang some of their well-known antislavery songs, such as “Get Off the Tracks” and “There’s a Good Time Coming.”

	The rhetoric was fiery, the demands revolutionary. “It is time, high time, and long has been time,” said the Rev. Samuel May, Jr., “when we should cut for ever the bloody bond which unites us to the slaveholders, slave-breeders and slave-traders of this nation, and henceforth have no part nor lot with them in the iniquity and infamy which they are determined to perpetuate, and in which so long they have made us, or we have consented to be made, instruments and participants.” Dr. Daniel Mann, the Garrison family’s dentist — in 1841 he had been forcibly ejected from a train after standing up for the rights of black passengers — suggested that Americans were “on the eve of a new revolution, which shall repeat the triumphs, but show the mistakes of the old; of a new confederation, which shall not only declare the self-evident truths of humanity, but abide by them and establish them, unterrified by menace, unbribed by flattery, undebased by compromises.”

	The climax of the convention was Garrison’s speech deriding “the pensioned tools of a pro-slavery Government,” including “mercenary traders, whose god is the ‘almighty dollar’” and “wily politicians, who will sacrifice every thing to their unhallowed lust for office.” Garrison dismissed the “ridiculous glorification of a Union which has only served to extend and strengthen slavery, and to weaken and degrade liberty.” The American Revolution had been a good start, he said, but there was more work to be done. “We have tried the experiment for almost three score years, and it has proved a failure,” Garrison said. “The living and the dead must not be bound together.”


and his mentor doing very bad job of opposing tyranny as well:

https://books.google.com/books?id=BjGrAAAAIAAJ&pg=PA70&lpg=PA70
	Garrison also benefited from conversations with Caleb Cushing, the son of a wealthy Newburyport merchant, recent Harvard graduate, friend of George Bancroft and Edward Everett, and contributor to Everett's North American Review. Cushing had returned to Newburyport in 1821 to practice law as a prelude to entering politics and then took over the editorship of the Herald when Allen was away. Cushing galled Garrison's attention to the evils of slavery, lent him books, and encouraged him to discern the tendencies of the age by studying the rebellions in Greece and the revolutions in South America.


https://books.google.com/books?id=Z4YEAAAAYAAJ&pg=PA330&lpg=PA330
	William Lloyd Garrison, 1805-1879: The Story of His Life Told by His Sons

	...W. L. Garrison to G. W. Benson.
	Boston, Sept. 30, 1839

	...Bro. James is slowly improving in health, but his case is a bad one. He has already taken three courses of the Thomsonian medicine, and will continue to take them until he is cured. I shall write to the Secretary of the Navy, at Washington, to see if I can get him discharged.2

	...2 James Garrison's constitution was so undermined by hardships and excesses that there could be no object in retaining him in the service. ...The friendly intervention of Caleb Cushing, then a member of the House of Representatives, removed the only obstacle to this desired release. On March 11, 1840, he writes to his townsman: "Receiving yours of the 6th, I have called again on the Secretary of the Navy, and he said he would reconsider the whole matter; and I think he is now satisfied that your brother's absence with you was a mere technical violation of the law, and involved no injury to the service, but the contrary, and that he will give such additional orders as to close the case in the manner desired. But if otherwise, please let me know, and I will press him further on the subject."


https://www.digitalcommonwealth.org/search/commonwealth:dv142x21g
	Letter from Caleb Cushing, Washington, [D.C.], to William Lloyd Garrison, 28 January 1840

	Dear Sir,

	From after I received your letter, I called on Mr. Paulding, and delivered your letter addressed to him, and solicited in my own home the release of your brother. He offered me it should be done if (as he did not doubt) the facts should prove to be as represented. I inquired of him again today, and he said that he had sent orders (?) to the Navy Yard for the discharge of your brother, if, on examination there, the facts were found conformable to the representations made. If any further difficulty interferes, pleases to let me know that I may interfere for its removal.

	I am,
	Yours truly,
	Cushing


https://scholarsarchive.byu.edu/cgi/viewcontent.cgi?referer=https://www.google.com/&httpsredir=1&article=1523&context=jeal
	Cushing set sail in the first week of August 1843 ...As the representative of a Whig administration headed by a slaveholder, Cushing also was very interested in the problem of race relations in India. During the voyage out and back he formulated a consistent philosophy of race relations which explained and even justified American Negro slavery on the same basis as extraterritoriality in China.


https://books.google.com/books?id=2JxCDgAAQBAJ&pg=PA174&lpg=PA174
	The Diplomatic Adventures of Caleb Cushing

	...Cushing's mission was to "secure the entry of American ships and cargoes into these ports on terms as favorable as those which are enjoyed by the English." In pursuit of this objective, Webster directed him to convey peaceful intentions. Cushing's "constant aim must be to produce a full conviction on the minds of the Government and the people [of China], that the mission is entirely pacific"


https://books.google.com/books?id=dgmDCgAAQBAJ&pg=PT98&lpg=PT98&
	Preceded by several U.S. warships, Cushing arrived in China in February, 1843, landing in the Portugeuse enclave of Macao. There he announced his intention of proceeding to the Chinese capital of Peking. But the emperor was in no hurry to have another British-style treaty imposed on him, and he made no move to permit the "Count" to enter into the interior of the country.

	...Cushing then ordered an American frigate to sail up Canton Bay to Whampoa and ire off a few threatening rounds. ...Cushing sent the following message:

		I can assure your excellency that this is not the way for China to cultivate good will and maintain peace. The late war with England was caused by the conduct of authorities at Canton, in disregarding the rights of public officers who represented the British Government.

		If, in the face of the experience of the last five years, the Chinese government now reverts to antiquated customs, which have already brought such disaster upon her, it can be regarded in no other light than as evidence that she invites and desires war with the other great Western Powers.


https://books.google.com/books?id=2JxCDgAAQBAJ&pg=PA174&lpg=PA174
	...and that the U.S. government "will not encourage, any violation of the commercial regulations of China." Webster also penned a letter (12 July 1834) from President John Tyler to the emperor and tasked Cushin with delivering it to Peking. ...without mentioning opium, asserts, "The Chinese love to trade with our people, and to sell them tea and silk, for which our people pay silver, and sometimes other articles." It concludes with President Tyler's reassurance to the emperor that "we shall not uphold them that break your laws," before signing off: "Your good friend, John Tyler."

	...Cushing pursued a different course, pushing beyond his official remit in attempting to render China's laws irrelevant to Americans in China. ...Cushing still had President Tyler's letter in hand. Cushing used its delivery as a pretense to insist that China negotiate a separate treaty with the United States


http://www.u-s-history.com/pages/h358.html
	Caleb Cushing, the first American commissioner to China, concluded the Treaty of Wang Hya (Wanghia) in 1844, which extended to the United States trading privileges equal to those enjoyed by Britain. In particular, this agreement opened certain Chinese “treaty ports" and provided “extraterritorial status" to Americans in China.

	...Extraterritorial status allowed certain foreign nationals to remain under the legal control of their home governments. This rendered them 
	exempt from local arrest, lawsuits and taxation. The undercurrent of this idea was that the native population was less civilized than the foreign visitors and could not be trusted to mete out proper justice. 


https://books.google.com/books?id=dgmDCgAAQBAJ&pg=PT98&lpg=PT98
	...his cousin John Perkins Cushing, was engaged in the illicit opium traffic in Cina, and was on his way to becoming one of the wealthiest men in the world.


https://books.google.com/books?id=omBQlIq2knwC&pg=PA86&lpg=PA86
	"Among the 'flowery-flag devils' as the Chinese called our compatriots, the Perkins-Sturgis-Forbes connection remained all powerful; for China trading required great experience in details, and sound financial backing. 'Ku shing', (John P. Cushing), their Canton agent, with only two clearks to his estalishment, did a business millions a year, and returned a wealthy man in 1830 to his Summer Street mansion at his Belmont estate, attended by a retinue of Chinese servants. Perkins and Company, James P. Sturgis and Co., Russell, Sturgs and Co., Russell and Sturgis of Manila were finally consolidated into the firm of Russell and Company of Canton ...Russell and Co., did more business at Canton than any other American house,    'we are told,' and no small measure of this success was due to the friendship of Honqua, the Chinese hong merchant; a legacy of John P. Cushing.


https://books.google.com/books?id=Tw4wBQAAQBAJ&pg=PA162&lpg=PA162&
	Cushing, who had arrived on the Bashaw with a cargo of opium, insured the continued influence of his family in Russell & Co. in several ways:

	1. He named Augustin Heard, an old acquaintance and East India captain for many years, as the representative of the Boston Concern. He alone would handle its business.

	2. Robert Bennet Forbes and his ship Lintin were to replace James P. Sturgis and the Tartar on the Lintin station with a monopoly of all the Rusell & Co.'s business at the outer anchorages.

	3. Seventeen-year-old John Murray Forbes was to become and "assistant" in the firm, in line for advancement to a partnership.

	To clinch the matter Cushing introduced his young cousin into Howqua's hon, where Forbes became the old merchant's English secretary and eventually the manager of all his overseas trade (which went out in Forbes's name). Although Perkins & Co., Canton, was formally going out of business, Cushing was leaving the Boston Concern powerful clews on its successor.


https://books.google.com/books?id=EzmcRFWM0NcC&pg=PA162
	Personally, a number of the merchants found [Caleb Cushing's] attire a bit ostentatious. Mrs. Nataniel Kinsman, the wife of a merchant with Russell and Company, complained that his sword constantly became entangled in her dress when they walked together. ...The economic stakes were high: the Yankees conceded dominance in the drug traffic, but millions of dollars in textiles were open to Anglo-American competition.

	...Cushing still understood correctly that securing respect and privileges for the United States should not come secondhand through an English treaty, but by a bilateral agreement with China. Therefore, he decided to press on in spite of the debatable need to continue.


https://books.google.com/books?id=2JxCDgAAQBAJ&pg=PA174&lpg=PA174
	...On 3 July, 1844, in a village temple outside of Macao, Cushing and Kying signed the treaty of Wanghia, including four originals in English and four in Chinese. Cushing sent two copies in English and two copies in Chinese back to Washington on the Sappho with Augistine Heard, who had directed Russell & Company in Canton from 1831 to 1836 before starting his own company in 1840.


https://en.wikisource.org/wiki/Treaty_of_Wanghia
	Article XXI.

	...citizens of the United States, who may commit any crime in China, shall be subject to be tried and punished only by the Consul, or other public functionary of the United States, thereto authorized according to the laws of the United States. And in order to the prevention of all controversy and disaffection, justice shall be equitably and impartially administered on both sides.

	...Article XXXIII.

	Citizens of the United States, who shall attempt to trade clandestinely with such of the ports of China as are not open to foreign commerce, or who shall trade in opium or any other contraband article of merchandize, shall be subject to be dealt with by the Chinese Government, without being entitled to any countenance or protection from that of the United States; and the United States will take measures to prevent their flag from being abused by the subjects of other nations, as a cover for the violation of the laws of the Empire.


http://www.amstudy.hku.hk/news/treatyports2011/files/sibinghe.pdf
	By the mid-1850s, Russell & Co. had successfully shifted its major operation from south China to the Yangtze valley. Opium remained the most important commodity imported to China after the First Opium War. “Although opium is a prohibited article and presumed to be ignored by the Chinese authorities, yet it forms so essential a portion of the foreign trade that no return would be complete without it,” wrote the British consul at Shanghai in 1856.70 Russell & Co. continued to profit from the opium business by operating four opium ships on the China coast. According to a New York China trader Townsend Harris's letter to the Secretary of State William L. Marcy, Russell & Co. was deeply involved in the illicit business, and four merchant-consuls of the Russell firm in both Shanghai and Canton engaged in the business. Harris revealed that “heavily armed & strongly manned” opium receiving ships were stationed at Jinxingmen (Cum-sing-moon金星門) near the mouth of the Pearl River and Wusong (Woosung吴淞), the mouth of the Yangtze River, about 8 miles from the city of Shanghai. The company also used a steamer to smuggle opium from Hong Kong to Canton.71 Pushed by public opinion, the United States government condemned the opium trade in principle, but it granted the largest U.S. opium traders consular status. The principle of extraterritoriality established in the Treaty of Wangxia in practice prevented Chinese authorities from prosecuting American opium traders. 


https://books.google.com/books?id=dgmDCgAAQBAJ&pg=PT98&lpg=PT98
	Returning in autumn 1844, from his mission to China, Caleb Cushing landed on Mexico's west coast, letting the ship proceed on home without him. Cushing then undertook an "intelligence-gathering" tour of the Mexican interior.

	..."While his coach was bowling along the national highway, between Peubla and Perote, a band of brigands suddenly appeared, wearing masks and armed with swords and pistols. In true bandit fashion, they halted the vehicle, and robed Cushing of some of his most valuable possessions. . . . Incensed by this outrage in broad daylight, Cushing complained to the Alcalde [mayor] in the village of El Pinal, but that official merely shrugged his shoulders. . . . Cushing was by this time in a passion. After the American Commissioner [to China] said in his best Castilian--which was excellent--'You may not care to listen to me now, but I shall some day return with an American Army at my back, and you may change your tune then. . . .' "It was rather less than four years later that Cushing, a Brigadier General in the Amercan forces invading Mexico, passed through the same village of El Pinal. . . .When he heard the familiar name, the incident of the robbery . . . came back to his memory. He sent a trop of guards to bring the Alcade before him; and soon the trembling Mexican appeared.  . . . General Cushing, assuming his sternest mien, then reminded the Mayor of their former meeting, explaining, with grim humor, that the United States never left unavenged such insults to its representatives, and leaving it to be inferred that this powerful army was there to exact reparation for the indignity offered him in 1844. The Alcalde was abjectly, tearfully penitent, and cringed at his captor's feet in submission. . . . At last Cushing released him. . . .

	"During his overland journey . . . Cushing acquired a considerable knowlede of Mexican character--a knowledge which, it may be added, led him to view war with that country with approbation and even elation.


https://books.google.com/books?id=5MZHAQAAMAAJ&pg=PA500&lpg=PA500
	This country was just about to plunge into war with Mexico, and in 1846 he was elected to the Massachusetts legislature, where he was a prominent advocate of the war in the face of a stormy opposition from the people of that State. When the legislature refused to appropriate funds to equip a regiment of volunteers, he advanced the requisite amount himself. He was then appointed colonel of the regiment, and went with it to Mexico in the spring of 1847, joining the army of Gen. Taylor. He was appointed brigadier-general April 14, 1847, and took part in the battle of Buena Vista.


https://books.google.com/books?id=RZtBAAAAYAAJ&pg=PA154&lpg=PA154
	At the close of the Pierce Administration, General Cushing retired into comparative privacy; but the voice of his ever-faithful constituency again and again pressed him into their service in the State Legislature. In that body he wields unmistakable influence, and even the journals politically opposed to him bear enthusiastic testimony of his being *the* legislator and orator.

	...On February 11, 1849, he said, "Mr. Speaker, I, you, we gentlemen of the House of Representatives, belong to that excellent white race, the consummate impersonation of intellect in man and of loveliness in woman; whose power and whose privilege it is, wherever they may go and wherever they may be, to Christianize and to civilize, to command and to be obeyed, to conquer and to reign. I admit to an equality with me, sir, the *white man*, my blood and my race, whether he be the Saxon of England or the Celt of Ireland. But I do *not* admit as my equals either the red men of America, or the yellow men of Asia, or the black men of Africa." This was greeted with tumultous applause in the galleries.

	,,,Mr. Cushing vigorously denounced the recent "invasion of the State of Virgina" by men from Northern States. He brought the case home to Massachusetts, and asked his hearers what would they say if there were organized bands of invaders in Virginia, armed by subscription societies in Richmonds, and inspired by sentiments of deadly hatred against them? Would they not say open war was better than war in disguise?


http://memory.loc.gov/cgi-bin/query/r?ammem/mcc:@field(DOCID%20@lit(mcc/070))
	Dred Scott v. Sanford, 19 How. 393, was decided by the United States Supreme Court on 6 March 1857. Scott (1809-1858), a slave, had been taken many years before from Missouri, a slave state, to the free state of Illinois and to Wisconsin Territory, where slavery was forbidden by the Missouri Compromise of 1820. After returning to Missouri, he sued for his freedom on the grounds that his residence in a free state and in free territory had released him from bondage. Chief Justice Roger B. Taney (1777-1864), delivering the opinion of the Court, held that a slave's status was fixed by the laws of the state in which he lived. Scott, as a slave, could not be a citizen and could not sue in the federal courts. Furthermore, since slaves were only property, they could not be regulated by Congress and excluded from any territory. The Missouri Compromise, which had already been repealed by the Kansas-Nebraska Act of 1854, was "not warranted by the Constitution, and [was] therefore void." Scott had not been made free by being carried into territory north of the compromise line. This decision greatly inflamed the sectional controversy and was denounced by antislavery elements everywhere.

	Caleb Cushing (1800-1879), who had served as attorney general under President Franklin Pierce (1804-1869), represented a minority voice raised in the North in support of Taney. In a major speech in Newburyport, Massachusetts, in October 1857, Cushing defended Taney as "the very incarnation of judicial purity, integrity, science and wisdom."1 Grateful for this support, Taney thanked Cushing in this letter of 9 November 1857, indicating that the "public mind" was not "in a condition to listen to reason" and noting that "wild passions ruled the hour." The Dred Scott decision was eventually made obsolete by the ratification of the Thirteenth Amendment. The aged Taney, considered to have been in the service of the "slave power," came to be judged in the light of the Dred Scott decision, and the prestige he had earned over a long and productive career in public service disappeared.

	1. Caleb Cushing, Speech Delivered in City Hall, Newburyport, October 31, 1857 (Boston: The Boston Post, 1857), 45.
 

https://www.history.com/this-day-in-history/dred-scott-decision
 	In fact, there were free black citizens of the United States in 1787, but Taney and the other justices were attempting to halt further debate on the issue of slavery in the territories. The decision inflamed regional tensions, which burned for another four years before exploding into the Civil War.


https://books.google.com/books?id=dgmDCgAAQBAJ&pg=PT115&lpg=PT115
	The 1860 national convention of the Democratic Party was held at Charleston, South Carolina. Caleb Cushing, who held no particular national office at that time, was selected as convention chairman.

	Under the supervision of Chairman Cushing, the Gulf States delegations staged a walkout in supposed reaction to a platform decision by the convention. Following the walkout, Cushing then ruled that no candidate could be chosen without the consent of two-thirds of the *original delegates*. Stephen Douglas and his northern backers were amazed and furious, and the convention broke up without choosing a candidate.

	The extremist South delegates, whooping it up in this dress rehearsal for Secession, now set up their own Convention-and Caleb Cushing of Massachusetts presided. The secessionists nominated Vice-President Breckinridge as *their* candidate or President, while Stephen Douglas was nominated by the remnants for the party.

	...From then until the election of Republican Abraham Lincoln, the Breckinridge "election campaign" had its unofficial headquarters in the White House, and its commander was the celebrated Caleb Cushing of Massachusetts.


https://www.nytimes.com/1860/09/08/archives/breckinridge-and-disunion.html
	Breckinridge and Disunion.

	SEPT. 8, 1860 

	...The Journal of Commerce assumes gratuitously that the TIMES denies the genuineness of Mr. BRECKINRIDGE's devotion to the Union; we have simply asserted that doubts upon the point reasonably exist. They exist, because Mr. BRECKINRIDGE is not the representative man of his party; and because the man who is, has proclaimed his purpose, if practicable, to dissolve the Union. Mr. BRECKINRIDGE certainly knows the ulterior objects of the Baltimore defection. We cannot help suspecting that he knows also how materially his own elevation to the Presidency would conduce to them, and herein is one ground of suspicion.

	Another lies in the fact that the party which sustains him has omitted no occasion to threaten that the election of Mr. LINCOLN would be reason enough for the South to retire from the Union. The Democratic competitor of Mr. BRECKINRIDGE had publicly denounced this specific type of treason, and had challenged the Vice-President to do as much. As the only tangible form in which disunion had presented itself, the challenge was a perfectly fair test of the candidate's loyalty. And yet Mr. BRECKINRIDGE made no response. His silence cannot be accounted for by assuming the point to be irrevelant, for it is clear, beyond all cavil, that the turning point of the actual contest, so far as his faction is concerned, is in this menace. Nor could its alleged unimportance have excused an answer, seeing that what BRECKINRIDGE had believed thus and so, when a youth, and why he had preferred a hunting bout at a distant time to a vote for a particular Presidential candidate, were made by him the topics of extended explanation; topics surely less momentous than the doubt as to what a large, and possibly influential, body of politicians are disposed to do in a probable and approaching contingency. For these reasons, we regard the genuineness of BRECKINRIDGE's patriotism as fairly a matter of doubt; and of that doubt the Journal of Commerce may, if it pleases, have the benefit


https://www.newspapers.com/image/355850147/?terms=Lincoln
	The Weekly Advertiser (Montgomery, Alabama) 12 Sep 1860

	..We hope no Southern man will forget Douglas's declaration in Norfolk the other day, that if Lincoln should be elected, he (Douglas) would do all in his power to aid his Administration in keeping the Southern States in subjection. Any Southern man who will support him after such a declaration is himself untrue to his section, and has less than one step to take to land him in the Black Republican camp!


https://www.newspapers.com/image/76168096/?terms=Lincoln
	Nashville Union and American (Nashville, Tennesse) 28 Sep 1860

	From Montgomery Mail Sept. 25.

	We do not know what, exactly, is the general reputation of the Naschville Patriot, "for truth and veracity but we are certain that a few misrepresentations of its contemporaries, as are contained in the following extract from one of its recent editorial articles, will soon place it where its credibility can be successfully impeached:

	"The Mail gives us sententions advice how to dissolve the Union. It tells us to run three candidates in opposition to the Republicans, and that will insure Lincoln's election, and that will insure dissolution. It tells us to provide for the consequences by refusing to pay our debts to Northern people--keep our money at home and bring on money panics and financial cries among our enemies, and they can do nothing"

	The reader will perhaps be a little astonished, when we say that nearly ever important allegation in the foregoing ... is utterly unjustified by any thing published in the Mail

	...we spoke of the probable election of Lincoln; and we remarked that if such an event happened and several Southern States  seceded therefore--as we believed and hoped they would--our merchants would e compelled, by the exigencies of their own States, to take an extension of a year at least, on the Northern indebteness.

	...on the contrary, we warned Douglas and Bell men, months ago, that by running their candidates, who had little, if any hopes, in the South, *they* were aiding the election of Lincoln.

	...At all times of the campaign, we have talked, prayed and worked against the election of Lincoln. We do not desire disunion. We deprecate it--although we hold it as far preferable to submission to Lincoln.


https://books.google.com/books?id=EzmcRFWM0NcC&pg=PA487&lpg=PA487
	Following the November elections, the South Carolina legislature called a convention to discuss secesion. The Buchanan administartion, faced with resignations by the secretary of state, secretary of war, and attorney general, seemed ill equipped to deal with the mounting crisis. Conequently, when the president called Cushing to the capital, many observers speculated about the motive. ...In fact, "Old Buck" had a different assignment in mind--traveling to South Carolina to plead with the convention to delay any final action regarding succession. Cushing arrived in Charleston before Christmas with his pro-southern reputation firmly in place.

	...he appeared to late to influence the fateful decision of the conclave. Newly elected Governor Francis Pickens cordially received the emissary on the morning of December 20 and promptly informed him that there was no hope for the Union.

	...Now, with the South rushing to disconnect from the Union, Wilson utilized a lengthy public letter to Cushing as a vehicle to backpedal on the slavery question. Chastising his compatriot for misrepresenting the Republican viewpoint on the issue, Wilson reaffirmed that southern rights would be protected under the new Lincoln regime.

	Cushing realized that such rhetoric came too late to assuage a disbelieving Dixie and that separation was assured. ...He publicly and privately derided January efforts at compromise, viewed William Seward's maneuvering as "blarney," John H. Crittenden's proposed ammendments as a "comedie," and the Tyler-led Peace Conention with skepticism. The Republicans, Cushing contended, drove traditional southerners into the disunionist camp and produced "the irreparable and unstoppable bisection of the Union."

	...Consequently, he watched the developing crisis in Charleston harbor from a keen vantage point. Cushing, who believed Lincoln lacked both the will and the capacity to defend Fort Sumter, seemed subsequently stunned when the Confederates actually opened fire on the instalation on April 12.

	...Southern rashness compelled him to reaffirm his loyalty to Masachusetts and the nation. When the president called up 75,000 volunters on April 15, Cushing returned to Newburyport prepared to commit himself by word and deed. In a passionate pro-Union speech he proclaimed that the day of discussion had passed and that of action had arrived. Although now age sixty-one, if called upon, he would be found in the field defending the Constitution and the nation. Friends urged him to imitate his actions of the Mexican War and raise a brigade of loyal sons of the Bay State. To that end, he wrote Governor John Andrew on April 25, "I have no desire to survive the overthrow of the government of the United States. I am ready for any sacrifice to avert such a catastrophe, and I ask only to be permitted to lay down my life in the service of the Commonwealth and the Union." ...Andrew rejected the offer "with painful reluctance," declaring that Cushing's southern sympathies and ongoing personal friendships with rebels created insurmountable difficulties.

	The activities of recent months had shattered Cushing's spirit and reputation. His post-November attacks on abolitionism and defense of the right of succession sparked the fire. Then the press misinterpreted the December trip to South Carolina as a mission to provide advice and counsel to aspiring secessionists. Rumors appeared in the newspapers that irate Pensylvanians had taunted and threatened him on a journey back home to Essex in April. Finally, came Andrew's well-publicized rejection.

	...By the summer of 1861 he contemplated traveling to Europe or South America...




...



https://www.newspapers.com/image/96011834/?terms=LaLaurie
	--

	Since the foregoing was written, we have received the Commercial Gazette of this city, and New-York Journal of Commerce, containing other accounts of this dreadful business, of which we may say--

	'Horror on horror accumulate!'

	[From the New-Orleans Courier.]


reprints "filled with worms!!!" article


	...[From the N. Y. Journal of Commerce.]

	A fire occurred yesterday in the house of 